Tennessee, session 114, SB0325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2711(h), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(8) Submit an annual report by February 1 of each year to the senate health and
welfare committee and the committee in the house of representatives with subject matter
jurisdiction over health-related issues that details, at a minimum, the council's findings,
progress on the comprehensive statewide plan and system of care, and
recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0325
002137
- 1 -